Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.530

Prescription drug assistance, education—Rules.

The authority may adopt rules to implement chapter 29, Laws of 2003 1st sp. sess.

[ 2003 1st sp.s. c 29 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 29: See notes following RCW 74.09.650.